District of Columbia statutes.
43-119

Movement or disposal of tissue taken from dead body.

The Council of the District of Columbia may, by act, authorize tissue banks operating pursuant to subchapter III of Chapter 15 of Title 7, or other persons subject to regulations made pursuant to subchapter II-A or III of Chapter 15 of Title 7, or both, to remove, transport, or dispose of tissue taken from such dead body.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1296, ch. 854, §§ 675, 676
Sept. 22, 1950, 64 Stat. 904, ch. 985, § 1
Sept. 10, 1962, 76 Stat. 536, Pub. L. 87-656, § 10
May 26, 1970, 84 Stat. 270, Pub. L. 91-268, § 9(f)
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 29(c)(1), 28 DCR 3271
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 30(g)(1), 55 DCR 2532
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 230(f), 56 DCR 1117

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1531.01, § 7-1541.01, § 7-1541.02, § 7-1541.03, § 7-1541.04, § 7-1541.06, § 7-1541.07, § 43-106, and § 43-107.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 27-119.
1973 Ed., § 27-119a.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-145 substituted “subchapter II-A” for “subchapter II”.
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction.